Utah statutes.
49-19-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Governor" includes former governors.

(2)  "Legislator" includes former legislators.

(3)  "Plan" means the Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Plan created under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

